Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Nuclear Energy Feasibility Study Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 803.1 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Within ninety (90) days after the passage and approval of
this act, the Oklahoma Corporation Commission shall start the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1375 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

proc ess to engage an outside consulting firm to provide the service
of conducting a technical and legal feasibility study on promoting
nuclear energy generation in this state. This engagement shall be
exempt from the state procurement process and shall follow the
Corporation Commission's process to retain expert witnesses on
behalf of the Commission to ensure the ability to timely conduct the
study and complete the requirements of this section.
B. The consulting firm shall be well-established in the nuclear
energy industry.
C. The feasibility study shall consider the following:
1. The advantages and disadvantages of nuclear energy
generation in this state, including, but not limited to, the
economic and environmental impact;
2. Ways to maximize the use of workers who reside in this state
and products made in this state in the construction of nuclear
energy generation facilities;
3. Evaluations, conclusions, and recommendations on the
following:
a. design characteristics and evaluation, including
specific recommendations of optimal designs based on
site characteristics and possible industrial uses,
b. environmental and ecological impacts,
c. land and siting criteria, including specific areas
that are best suited for new nuclear energy generation
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1375 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

based on the land and siting criteria, as well as
cities near military bases that may use nuclear
electric generation to meet the military resiliency
requirements of 10 U.S.C., Section 2920,
d. safety criteria,
e. engineering and cost-related criteria, and
f. small modular nuclear reactor and microreactor
capability;
4. Socioeconomic assessment and impact analysis, including, but
not limited to, the following:
a. workforce education, training, and development,
b. local and state tax base,
c. supply chains, and
d. permanent and temporary job creation;
5. The timeline for development, including areas of potential
acceleration or efficiencies and leveraging existing facilities
within this state;
6. Literature review of studies that have assessed the
potential impact of nuclear energy generation; and
7. Assessment and recommendation of current and future policies
that may be needed to support or accelerate the adoption of nuclear
energy generation or may improve its cost-effectiveness, including a
survey of federal programs and other methods that could financially
assist a nuclear project in the state.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1375 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. The Oklahoma Corporation Commission, state public utilities,
cooperatives, and municipally owned utilities shall cooperate in
providing information relevant to the feasibility study, as needed,
subject to notifications to stakeholders and reasonable safeguards
to protect confidential information from being made public.
E. Not later than nine (9) months after the effective date of
this act, the Oklahoma Corporation Commission shall deliver a
written report on the feasibility study to the Governor, and the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate and the Speaker
of the Oklahoma House of Representatives who shall forward the
report to the appropriate committees.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 803.2 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Corporation Commission shall be authorized to
retain, negotiate with, and expend an amount not to exceed Three
Hundred Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($375,000.00) or so much
thereof as may be necessary to provide compensation to the
consulting firm as required by this act.
In the event the Oklahoma Corporation Commission is unable to
hire a consulting firm to complete the feasibility study for the
budgeted amount allowed in this section, the Oklahoma Corporation
Commission is authorized to conduct a notice of inquiry and utilize
the information received from the stakeholders in conjunction with
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1375 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the consulting firm to reduce the cost of gathering information for
the purpose of the study and report.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
April 23, 2025 - DO PASS

















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1375 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)